Utah statutes.
78A-4-106.   Appellate Mediation Office -- Protected records and information -- Governmental immunity.

(1)  Unless a more restrictive rule of court is adopted pursuant to Subsection 63G-2-201(3)(b), information and records relating to any matter on appeal received or generated by the Chief Appellate Mediator or other staff of the Appellate Mediation Office as a result of any party's participation or lack of participation in the settlement program shall be maintained as protected records pursuant to Subsections 63G-2-305(16), (17), and (32).

(2)  In addition to the access restrictions on protected records provided in Section 63G-2-202, the information and records may not be disclosed to judges, staff, or employees of any court of this state.

(3)  The Chief Appellate Mediator may disclose statistical and other demographic information as may be necessary and useful to report on the status and to allow supervision and oversight of the Appellate Mediation Office.

(4)  When acting as mediators, the Chief Appellate Mediator and other professional staff of the Appellate Mediation Office shall be immune from liability pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah.

(5)  Pursuant to Utah Constitution, Article VIII, Section 4, the Supreme Court may exercise overall supervision of the Appellate Mediation Office as part of the appellate process.

